nl: Baby en peuter > Luiermaterialen > Babydoekjes: Stoffen babydoekjes; Wegwerpbabydoekjes; Doorspoelbare babydoekjes
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přebalování > Dětské ubrousky: Látkové dětské ubrousky; Jednorázové dětské ubrousky; Splachovatelné dětské ubrousky
nb: Baby og barn > Bleieutstyr > Babykluter: Babykluter i tøy; Éngangsservietter for baby; Spylbare babykluter
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Pañales y cuidado del bebé > Toallitas infantiles: Toallitas de tela para bebés; Toallitas desechables para bebés; Toallitas para bebés desechables por el WC
da: Baby og småbørn > Bleskift > Babyvådservietter: Babyservietter; Babyvådservietter til engangsbrug; Skylbare babyservietter
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 尿布相关用品 > 婴儿湿巾: 婴儿布湿巾; 一次性婴儿湿巾; 可冲洗婴儿湿巾
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Change de bébé > Lingettes pour bébés: Lingettes en tissu pour bébés; Lingettes jetables pour bébés; Lingettes jetables aux toilettes pour bébés
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Смяна на пелени > Бебешки кърпички: Платени бебешки кърпички; Бебешки кърпички за еднократна употреба; Водоразградими бебешки кърпички
sv: Baby och småbarn > Blöjbyte > Babyvåtservetter: Tygbabyservetter; Babyservetter för engångsbruk; Spolbara babyservetter
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Articole scutece > Șervețele pentru copii: Șervețele din pânză pentru copii; Șervețele de unică folosință pentru copii; Șervețele care pot fi aruncate la toaletă
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Previjanje > Otroški robčki: Otroške krpice; Otroški robčki za enkratno uporabo; Biološko razgradljivi otroški robčki
ja: ベビー用品 > おむつ用品 > おしりふき: 布製おしりふき; 使い捨ておしりふき; 流せるおしりふき
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αλλαγή πάνας > Παιδικά μαντηλάκια: Υφασμάτινα μωρομάντηλα; Μωρομάντηλα μιας χρήσης; Μωρομάντηλα που απορρίπτονται στην τουαλέτα
ru: Товары для детей > Пеленание > Детские салфетки: Тканевые детские салфетки; Одноразовые детские салфетки; Смываемые детские салфетки
ko: 영유아 > 기저귀용품 > 아기 물티슈: 아기용 물수건; 일회용 아기 물티슈; 변기에 버리는 아기 물티슈
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Ornamentação > Fraldas para bebé: Toalhitas de pano para bebé; Toalhitas descartáveis para bebé; Toalhitas solúveis para bebé
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Alt Alma Ürünleri > Bebek Islak Mendilleri: Bez Bebek Mendilleri; Tek Kullanımlık Bebek Mendilleri; Yıkanabilir Bebek Mendilleri
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Tã/bỉm > Khăn ướt cho bé: Khăn ướt cho bé bằng vải; Khăn ướt cho bé dùng một lần; Khăn ướt cho bé xả được
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 尿布 > 嬰兒柔濕巾: 布製嬰兒柔濕巾; 拋棄式嬰兒柔濕巾; 可沖洗嬰兒柔濕巾
en: Baby & Toddler > Diapering > Baby Wipes: Cloth Baby Wipes; Disposable Baby Wipes; Flushable Baby Wipes
it: Bebè e bimbi > Cambio pannolini > Salviettine: Salviettine in tessuto per neonati; Salviette usa e getta per neonati; Salviette lavabili per neonati
sk-SK: Bábätká > Prebaľovanie > Detské obrúsky: Detské látkové obrúsky; Jednorazové detské obrúsky; Splachovateľné detské obrúsky
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pelenaštvo > Maramice za bebe: Platnene maramice za bebe; Jednokratne maramice za bebe; Maramice za bebe koje se mogu baciti u odvod
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Vystymas > Servetėlės kūdikiams: Medžiaginės servetėlės kūdikiams; Vienkartinės servetėlės kūdikiams; Nuleisti į kanalizaciją tinkamos servetėlės kūdikiams
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Pelenkázás > Baba törlőkendők: Szövet baba törlőkendők; Eldobható baba törlőkendők; Öblíthető baba törlőkendők
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vaippatarvikkeet > Vauvan kosteuspyyhkeet: Vauvan kankaiset kosteuspyyhkeet; Kertakäyttöiset vauvan kosteuspyyhkeet; WC:hen huuhdeltavat vauvan kosteuspyyhkeet
pt-BR: Infantil > Troca de fraldas > Lenços umedecidos para bebês: Lenços umedecidos de pano; Lenços umedecidos descartáveis; Lenços umedecidos laváveis
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Wickelbedarf > Baby-Reinigungstücher: Babytücher aus Stoff; Einweg-Babyfeuchttücher; Herunterspülbare Babyfeuchttücher
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Przewijanie > Chusteczki dla niemowląt: Ściereczki dla niemowląt; Jednorazowe chusteczki dla niemowląt; Chusteczki biodegradowalne dla niemowląt
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม > ทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับทารก: ผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาดทารก; ทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับทารกแบบใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับทารกแบบกดชักโครกได้